Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-608
Property; condemnation; plat; filing.

All cities of the first class upon condemning private property, shall cause to be recorded an accurate plat and a clear, definite description of the property so taken in the office of the register of deeds for the county within which such city is located, within sixty days after the other legal steps for the acquisition of such title shall have been taken.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 50, p. 268;

R.S.1913, § 4907;

C.S.1922, § 4075;

C.S.1929, § 16-604;

R.S.1943, § 16-608.